Arkansas, session 2025, HB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 1-5-101 is amended to read as follows:
1-5-101. Official holidays.
(a) The following days are declared to be the sole official holidays
applicable to state government in Arkansas:
(1) New Year's Day — January 1;
(2) Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s Birthday — the third Monday in
January;
(3) George Washington's Birthday and Daisy Gatson Bates Day —
the third Monday in February;
(4) Good Friday – the Friday immediately preceding Easter
Sunday;
(4)(5) Memorial Day — the last Monday in May;
(5)(6) Independence Day — July 4;
(6)(7) Labor Day — the first Monday in September;
(7)(8) Veterans Day — November 11;
(8)(9) Thanksgiving Day — the fourth Thursday in November;
(9)(10) Christmas Eve — December 24;
(10)(11) Christmas Day — December 25; and
*LGL012*
01/16/2025 8:33:31 AM LGL012

HB1162
(11)(12) An employee's birthday — an employee is granted one (1)
holiday to observe his or her birthday.
(b) A holiday falling on a Saturday will be observed on the preceding
Friday. A holiday falling on a Sunday will be observed on the succeeding
Monday.
(c) It is the specific intent of the General Assembly that all state
employees shall be entitled to eleven (11) twelve (12) paid holidays per
year. The Office of Personnel Management shall promulgate rules and
regulations to assure this legislative intent.



























01/16/2025 8:33:31 AM LGL012